Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.014

Exemption from nonresident tuition fees differential.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may exempt the following nonresidents from paying all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential:

(1) Any person who resides in the state of Washington and who holds a graduate service appointment designated as such by a public institution of higher education or is employed for an academic department in support of the instructional or research programs involving not less than twenty hours per week during the term such person shall hold such appointment.

(2) Any faculty member, classified staff member or administratively exempt employee holding not less than a half time appointment at an institution who resides in the state of Washington, and the dependent children and spouse of such persons.

(3) Any immigrant refugee and the spouse and dependent children of such refugee, if the refugee (a) is on parole status, or (b) has received an immigrant visa, or (c) has applied for United States citizenship.

(4) Any dependent of a member of the United States congress representing the state of Washington.

[ 2015 c 55 s 208; 2000 c 117 s 3; 1997 c 433 s 3; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 5; 1992 c 231 s 3. Prior: 1989 c 306 s 3; 1989 c 290 s 3; 1985 c 362 s 1; 1984 c 232 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 273 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1997 c 433: See notes following RCW 28B.15.725.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Intent—1989 c 290: See note following RCW 28B.15.725.

Severability—1984 c 232: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 232 s 2.]

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 273: See note following RCW 28B.15.011.